Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-416
Claims; payment; warrants; registration; interest; use in payment of taxes.

All claims against drainage districts created by landowners shall be paid by warrants or orders, duly drawn on the treasurer of such drainage district, signed by the president of such district and countersigned by its clerk or secretary. When such warrants or orders have been issued and delivered, the same may be presented to the treasurer of the drainage district, and, if such be the fact, endorsed not paid for want of funds. Such orders or warrants shall be registered by the treasurer of the district, in the order of presentation, shall draw interest from the date of registration thereof, and shall be received by the county treasurer in payment of drainage district taxes due the general fund of such district.

Laws 1921, c. 275, § 2, p. 905;

C.S.1922, § 1828;

C.S.1929, § 31-516;

R.S.1943, § 31-416;

Laws 1969, c. 51, § 90, p. 331.